src-fst-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
* gælvodibme # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *gælvodibme:* `gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gälvodibme:* `gælvodibme+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gælvodimev:* `gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gälvodimev:* `gælvodibme+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gælvodis:* `gælvodibme+A+Attr`
* *gälvodis:* `gælvodibme+A+Attr`
* *gælvodabbo:* `gælvodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gälvodabbo:* `gælvodibme+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON TJALMEDIBME   Like UDNODIBME but no comparatives. Sg Acc: tjalmedimev, Attr: tjalmedis.

* huvsodibme # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *huvsodibme:* `huvsodibme+A+Sg+Nom`
* *huvsodimev:* `huvsodibme+A+Sg+Acc`
* *huvsodis:* `huvsodibme+A+Attr`

LEXICON SUOLASIEHKE  -siehke. Sg Acc: suolasiegev, attr: suolasiek

* hánessiehke # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *hánessiehke:* `hánessiehke+A+Sg+Nom`
* *hánessiegev:* `hánessiehke+A+Sg+Acc`
* *hánessiek:* `hánessiehke+A+Attr`

## Odd-syllable stems
###  With CG Sorted by attr

LEXICON TJIEGOS  Attr same as pred. For adjectives with -e in second syllable e>á: divtes>diktásav in StrG. As a. in Spiik.  Sg Acc: tjiehkusav, Attr: tjiegos. Consonant gradation. 

* hánes # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *måskas:* `måskas+A+Sg+Nom`
* *moasskasav:* `måskas+A+Sg+Acc`
* *måskas:* `måskas+A+Attr`
* *moasskasabbo:* `måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *bihtja:* `bihtja+A+Sg+Nom`
* *bihttjagav:* `bihtja+A+Sg+Acc`
* *bihtja:* `bihtja+A+Attr`
* *bihttjagabbo:* `bihtja+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON LINES  Attr ending on -a. Adjektives ending on -es. Does same as TJIEGOS, but with attr -a.   As g. in Spiik.  lines, Sg Acc: lidnásav, attr: lidna. Consonant gradation.

* lines # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *lines:* `lines+A+Sg+Nom`
* *lidnásav:* `lines+A+Sg+Acc`
* *lidna:* `lines+A+Attr`
* *lidnásabbo:* `lines+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON GALMAS   Attr ending on -a or -å. Adjectives on -as, ås- and ás. As e. in Spiik. Sg Acc: galmmasav, attr: galmma, Consonant gradation.

* njuoskas # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *njuoskas:* `njuoskas+A+Sg+Nom`
* *njuosskasav:* `njuoskas+A+Sg+Acc`
* *njuosska:* `njuoskas+A+Attr`
* *njuosskasabbo:* `njuoskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON OAMES  Attr ending on -e. Adjectives on -es with attribute -e. As g2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: oabmásav, Attr: oabme. Consonant gradation.

* goastes # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *goastes:* `goastes+A+Sg+Nom`
* *goasstásav:* `goastes+A+Sg+Acc`
* *goasste:* `goastes+A+Attr`
* *goasstásabbo:* `goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON SUOHKAT  Attr III -is, not suohkkadis but SUOHKKIS. With CG to attr, not from nom to Acc. Same as JALGGAT only with this CG. SUOHKKIS. Without CG between nom and acc. Adjectives on -at and -åt, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: suohkadav, attr: suohkkis,

* rávvat # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rávvat:* `rávvat+A+Sg+Nom`
* *rávvadav:* `rávvat+A+Sg+Acc`
* *rávvis:* `rávvat+A+Attr`
* *rávvadabbo:* `rávvat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON MÅJDÅS  Adjectives with no attr. With CG. Sg Acc: måjddåsav. If there is an attribute that dosn't fit to any lexicon it mus be hardcoded.

* rávdes # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rávdes:* `rávdes+A+Sg+Nom`
* *rávddásav:* `rávdes+A+Sg+Acc`
* *rávddásabbo:* `rávdes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

Without CG

LEXICON VIEKSES  Attr same as pred. Without CG, but With vowel changes.  Sg Acc: væksásav, Attr: viekses. Like TJIEGOS only without the CG but with vowel changes. Mayby change this to a lexicon withput attr and then hardcode attr?

LEXICON ALEK  Attr same as pred. Without CG, without any vowel changes. Like TJIEGOS only without the CG an vowelchanges. 

* purpur # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *purpur:* `purpur+A+Sg+Nom`
* *purpurav:* `purpur+A+Sg+Acc`
* *purpur:* `purpur+A+Attr`
* *purpurabbo:* `purpur+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON BASSTEL   Attr ening on -is. Without CG. Adjs on -et, -l, -r, sm om -k, -sj with attr -is and no consonant gradation. As b. in Spiik. Sg Acc: basstelav, Attr: basstelis. Many of these entries might be instances of derivations, like belak, deblak, and maybe also basstel, bargán.

* goavrret # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *goavrret:* `goavrret+A+Sg+Nom`
* *goavrredav:* `goavrret+A+Sg+Acc`
* *goavrredis:* `goavrret+A+Attr`
* *goavrredabbo:* `goavrret+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON MUTTÁK  Two attr enings -is and same as pred. Without CG. Adjs on -ák/-ak/-ek, two attr: -is and same as pred. As c. in Spiik. Sg Acc: muttágav, Attr: muttágis and mutták. These seem to be instances of the adjectival -k derivation. Unclear whether such derivation have different attr forms or not, and thats maybe why some of these derivations are found in BASSTEL lexicon.

* bárvak # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *bárvak:* `bárvak+A+Sg+Nom`
* *bárvagav:* `bárvak+A+Sg+Acc`
* *bárvak:* `bárvak+A+Attr`
* *bárvagis:* `bárvak+A+Attr`
* *bárvagabbo:* `bárvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON JALGGAT  Attr III -is, not jalggadis but JALGGIS. Without CG.  Adjectives on -at, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: jalggadav, attr: jalggis,

* russjkat # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *russjkat:* `russjkat+A+Sg+Nom`
* *russjkadav:* `russjkat+A+Sg+Acc`
* *russjkis:* `russjkat+A+Attr`
* *russjkadabbo:* `russjkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON TJÅRGGÅT  Attr III -is, not tjårggådis but tjårggis. Without CG. Same as JALGGAT only for adjectives ending ot -åt. Adjectives on -åt, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: jalggadav, attr: jalggis,

* russjkat # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *russjkat:* `russjkat+A+Sg+Nom`
* *russjkadav:* `russjkat+A+Sg+Acc`
* *russjkis:* `russjkat+A+Attr`
* *russjkadabbo:* `russjkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON RIHTSOK  No attr, without CG and also without any vowelchanges. The lexicon gives no attribute, either because the adjective dosnºt have attr, because there is stemvowel change in attr that the lexicon canºt handle or because there are strange atrributes that donºt fit to any other lexicon (these attributes are hardcoded). Sg Acc: rihtsogav. 

* rihtsok # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rihtsok:* `rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom`
* *rihtsogav:* `rihtsok+A+Sg+Acc`
* *rihtsogabbo:* `rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

exception lexicons for odd-syll

LEXICON IENNILS  no comparatives, attr same as pred.

* ieŋŋils # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *ieŋŋils:* `ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom`
* *ieŋŋilsav:* `ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON RÁDAS   Presently only used for "rádas". This word has special consonant gradation d>dd. Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: ráddasav, Attr: rádas. Consonant gradation.

* rádas # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *rádas:* `rádas+A+Sg+Nom`
* *ráddasav:* `rádas+A+Sg+Acc`
* *rádas:* `rádas+A+Attr`
* *ráda:* `rádas+A+Attr` (Eng. # from LEXATTR)
* *ráddasabbo:* `rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON LUOBES   Err/Orth lexicon! Does the same as TJIEGOS only e>a instead of usuall e>á, must be some err/orth. Sg Acc: luohpasav, Attr: luobes. Consonant gradation. NO Attr, must be hardcoded

LEXICON LÅSSÅT  Two attr, two comp. As f3. in Spiik. So far the only word i this lexicon i "låssåt", because both låssis and låsså are attr and comparative is both låsep(hybrid?) and låssådabbo.

* låssåt # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *låssåt:* `låssåt+A+Sg+Nom`
* *låssådav:* `låssåt+A+Sg+Acc`
* *låssis:* `låssåt+A+Attr`
* *låsså:* `låssåt+A+Attr`
* *låssådabbo:* `låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *låsep:* `låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON STUORAK   Only for stuorak. It hase two attributes. Has even-syllable comparison: stuoráp and stuorámus.Sg Acc: stuoragav, attr: stuor and stuorra. This might be a -k derivation of adjective stuorre attr stuor(ra). The comparison is thus based on the original adjective and thus it naturally is an even syll comparison.

* stuorak # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *stuorak:* `stuorak+A+Sg+Nom`
* *stuoragav:* `stuorak+A+Sg+Acc`
* *stuorra:* `stuorak+A+Attr`
* *stuor:* `stuorak+A+Attr`
* *stuoráp:* `stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ALLAK  Adjs on -ak, attr.on -a. Have both gasep/gaggagabbo and alep/allagabbo as comparatives. As d. in Spiik. So far only the adjectives "allak" and "gassak" go to this lexicon.

* gassak # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *gassak:* `gassak+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gassagav:* `gassak+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gassa:* `gassak+A+Attr`
* *gassagabbo:* `gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gasep:* `gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON GÅBDDÅK   Adjs on -åk, attr. on -å. Has even-syllable comparison: gåbdep and gåbdemus. So far "gåbddåk" is the only word in this lexicon. As d2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: gåbddågav, Attr: gåbddå.

* gåbddåk # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *gåbddåk:* `gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom`
* *gåbddågav:* `gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc`
* *gåbddå:* `gåbddåk+A+Attr`
* *gåbdep:* `gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

Inherent comparatives and superlatives

LEXICON NUORTTALABBO    Inherent comparatives, gives both comp and superl. Most of the words are the compared forms of -el(a) words, like nuorttal, lullel.

* guddnelabbo # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *guddnelabbo:* `guddnelabbo+A+Gram/Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *guddnelamos:* `guddnelabbo+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom`
* *guddnelap:* `guddnelabbo+A+Gram/Comp+Attr`
* *guddnelup:* `guddnelabbo+A+Gram/Comp+Attr`

LEXICON GASSKALAMOS    Inherent superlatives, gives onlys superl. Words that are lexicalized in their superlative forms. 

* ájtodamos # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *ájtodamos:* `ájtodamos+A+Gram/Superl+Sg+Nom`

## Contracted stems

LEXICON SÁDNES   Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: sáddnáv, Attr: sádnes.

* hávres # Contracted test examples:*
* *hávres:* `hávres+A+Sg+Nom`
* *hávrráv:* `hávres+A+Sg+Acc`
* *hávres:* `hávres+A+Attr`
* *hávrráp:* `hávres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON GOAVSOS   Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: goaksuv, Attr: goavsos.(goavsos is so far the only word in this lexicon)

* goavsos # Contracted test examples:*
* *goavsos:* `goavsos+A+Sg+Nom`
* *goaksuv:* `goavsos+A+Sg+Acc`
* *goaksusav:* `goavsos+A+Sg+Acc` (Eng. # From lexicon TJIEGOS)
* *goavsos:* `goavsos+A+Attr`
* *goaksup:* `goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *goaksusabbo:* `goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # from lexicon TJIEGOS)

LEXICON SUVRES   Sg Acc: suvrráv, Attr: suvra.

* suvres # Contracted test examples:*
* *suvres:* `suvres+A+Sg+Nom`
* *suvrráv:* `suvres+A+Sg+Acc`
* *suvrrásav:* `suvres+A+Sg+Acc` (Eng. # From lexicon SJÆVNNJAT)
* *suvra:* `suvres+A+Attr`
* *suvrráp:* `suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *suvrrásabbo:* `suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # from LINES)

LEXICON GÅLMAKTES   Attr same as pred. without cg but with vowel changes. Sg Acc: gålmaktáv, Attr: gålmaktes. VIEKSES makes odd-syll same thing. 

----

# Comparation

LEXICON BU/MUS   comparison for even-syll adjectives. Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.

LEXICON ABBO/AMOS   comparison for odd-syll adjectives.  Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.

LEXICON BUStem  Comparative even-syll, case and attr.

LEXICON ABBO  Comparative odd-syll, get case and attr. With the dialect differences "-ubbo" and "-æbbo".

## Superlative

LEXICON BUOREMUS  Superlative even-syll, get attr and nom case.

LEXICON AMOS  Superlative odd-syll, get case and attr. With the dialect differences "-umos" and "-æmos".

Comparative and Superlative sub-lexica

LEXICON CompSup-EVEN 

LEXICON CompSup-EVENWEAKSTEM  

LEXICON ATTR   Sends attributes to

LEXICON ATTR_PrsPrc   Attr without -vuohta derivation.

## Derivation of adjectives

LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1  ! even noun stems are sent here

LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1_1  ! even noun stems without grade alternation are sent here

LEXICON DenominalAdjsV2  ! even noun stems are sent here. -asj derivation

LEXICON DenominalAdjsKINO  ! unassimilated nouns are sent here

LEXICON DenominalAdjsODD   ! gives derivation -ahtes

LEXICON DenominalAdjsContr 

Derivations to adjectives, hardcoded in adjectives stems file

LEXICON DIEHTEMAHTES  ! odd syllable For hardcoded -ahtes words.

LEXICON LÁGÁSJ 

LEXICON BÁJNUK  ! hardcoded denominal derivations, latus has changed from o>u, a>a, e>á (Bájnno>bájnuk, juolgge>juolgák, giella>gielak.  Attr same as pred, no comp in this lexicon. 
